dics/ru/ru_RU.aff
SFX Y Y 435
SFX Y   чь   жешь         чь
SFX Y   чь   жете         чь
SFX Y   чь   жет          чь
SFX Y   чь   жем          чь
SFX Y   чь   гут          чь
SFX Y   чь   гу           чь
SFX Y   заться жутся        заться
SFX Y   заться жусь         заться
SFX Y   заться жешься       заться
SFX Y   заться жется        заться
SFX Y   заться жетесь       заться
SFX Y   заться жемся        заться
SFX Y   зать жут          зать
SFX Y   зать жу           зать
SFX Y   зать жешь         зать
SFX Y   зать жете         зать
SFX Y   зать жет          зать
SFX Y   зать жем          зать
SFX Y   ыться удутся       быться
SFX Y   ыться удусь        быться
SFX Y   ыться удешься      быться
SFX Y   ыться удется       быться
SFX Y   ыться удетесь      быться
SFX Y   ыться удемся       быться
SFX Y   ыть  удут         быть
SFX Y   ыть  уду          быть
SFX Y   ыть  удешь        быть
SFX Y   ыть  удете        быть
SFX Y   ыть  удет         быть
SFX Y   ыть  удем         быть
SFX Y   ваться овутся       зваться
SFX Y   ваться овусь        зваться
SFX Y   ваться овешься      зваться
SFX Y   ваться овется       зваться
SFX Y   ваться оветесь      зваться
SFX Y   ваться овемся       зваться
SFX Y   ваться овёшься      зваться
SFX Y   ваться овётся       зваться
SFX Y   ваться овётесь      зваться
SFX Y   ваться овёмся       зваться
SFX Y   вать овут         звать
SFX Y   вать ову          звать
SFX Y   вать овешь        звать
SFX Y   вать овете        звать
SFX Y   вать овет         звать
SFX Y   вать овем         звать
SFX Y   вать овёшь        звать
SFX Y   вать овёте        звать
SFX Y   вать овёт         звать
SFX Y   вать овём         звать
SFX Y   жаться гутся        жаться
SFX Y   жаться гусь         жаться
SFX Y   жать гут          жать
SFX Y   жать гу           жать
SFX Y   ться шься         даться
SFX Y   ться вутся        лыться
SFX Y   ться вусь         лыться
SFX Y   ться вешься       лыться
SFX Y   ться вется        лыться
SFX Y   ться ветесь       лыться
SFX Y   ться вемся        лыться
SFX Y   ться вёшься       лыться
SFX Y   ться вётся        лыться
SFX Y   ться вётесь       лыться
SFX Y   ться вёмся        лыться
SFX Y   ться стся         даться
SFX Y   ться нутся        статься
SFX Y   ться нусь         статься
SFX Y   ться нешься       статься
SFX Y   ться нется        статься
SFX Y   ться нетесь       статься
SFX Y   ться немся        статься
SFX Y   ться мся          даться
SFX Y   ться дутся        даться
SFX Y   ться дитесь       даться
SFX Y   ться димся        даться
SFX Y   ть   шь           дать
SFX Y   ть   вут          лыть
SFX Y   ть   ву           лыть
SFX Y   ть   вешь         лыть
SFX Y   ть   вете         лыть
SFX Y   ть   вет          лыть
SFX Y   ть   вем          лыть
SFX Y   ть   вёшь         лыть
SFX Y   ть   вёте         лыть
SFX Y   ть   вёт          лыть
SFX Y   ть   вём          лыть
SFX Y   ть   ут           лезть
SFX Y   ть   у            лезть
SFX Y   ть   ст           дать
SFX Y   ть   нут          стать
SFX Y   ть   ну           стать
SFX Y   ть   нешь         стать
SFX Y   ть   нете         стать
SFX Y   ть   нет          стать
SFX Y   ть   нем          стать
SFX Y   ть   м            дать
SFX Y   ть   ешь          лезть
SFX Y   ть   ете          лезть
SFX Y   ть   ет           лезть
SFX Y   ть   ем           лезть
SFX Y   ть   дут          дать
SFX Y   ть   дите         дать
SFX Y   ть   дим          дать
SFX Y   таться чутся        [^с]таться
SFX Y   таться чусь         [^с]таться
SFX Y   таться чешься       [^с]таться
SFX Y   таться чется        [^с]таться
SFX Y   таться четесь       [^с]таться
SFX Y   таться чемся        [^с]таться
SFX Y   тать чут          [^с]тать
SFX Y   тать чу           [^с]тать
SFX Y   тать чешь         [^с]тать
SFX Y   тать чете         [^с]тать
SFX Y   тать чет          [^с]тать
SFX Y   тать чем          [^с]тать
SFX Y   сться дутся        асться
SFX Y   сться дусь         асться
SFX Y   сться дешься       асться
SFX Y   сться дется        асться
SFX Y   сться детесь       асться
SFX Y   сться демся        асться
SFX Y   сться дёшься       асться
SFX Y   сться дётся        асться
SFX Y   сться дётесь       асться
SFX Y   сться дёмся        асться
SFX Y   сть  дут          асть
SFX Y   сть  ду           асть
SFX Y   сть  дешь         асть
SFX Y   сть  дете         асть
SFX Y   сть  дет          асть
SFX Y   сть  дем          асть
SFX Y   сть  дёшь         асть
SFX Y   сть  дёте         асть
SFX Y   сть  дёт          асть
SFX Y   сть  дём          асть
SFX Y   стись тутся        лестись
SFX Y   стись тусь         лестись
SFX Y   стись тешься       лестись
SFX Y   стись тется        лестись
SFX Y   стись тетесь       лестись
SFX Y   стись темся        лестись
SFX Y   стись тёшься       лестись
SFX Y   стись тётся        лестись
SFX Y   стись тётесь       лестись
SFX Y   стись тёмся        лестись
SFX Y   стись дутся        вестись
SFX Y   стись дусь         вестись
SFX Y   стись дешься       вестись
SFX Y   стись дется        вестись
SFX Y   стись детесь       вестись
SFX Y   стись демся        вестись
SFX Y   стись дёшься       вестись
SFX Y   стись дётся        вестись
SFX Y   стись дётесь       вестись
SFX Y   стись дёмся        вестись
SFX Y   сти  тут          лести
SFX Y   сти  ту           лести
SFX Y   сти  тешь         лести
SFX Y   сти  тете         лести
SFX Y   сти  тет          лести
SFX Y   сти  тем          лести
SFX Y   сти  тёшь         лести
SFX Y   сти  тёте         лести
SFX Y   сти  тёт          лести
SFX Y   сти  тём          лести
SFX Y   сти  дут          вести
SFX Y   сти  ду           вести
SFX Y   сти  дешь         вести
SFX Y   сти  дете         вести
SFX Y   сти  дет          вести
SFX Y   сти  дем          вести
SFX Y   сти  дёшь         вести
SFX Y   сти  дёте         вести
SFX Y   сти  дёт          вести
SFX Y   сти  дём          вести
SFX Y   сти  бут          рести
SFX Y   сти  бу           рести
SFX Y   сти  бешь         рести
SFX Y   сти  бете         рести
SFX Y   сти  бет          рести
SFX Y   сти  бем          рести
SFX Y   сти  бёшь         рести
SFX Y   сти  бёте         рести
SFX Y   сти  бёт          рести
SFX Y   сти  бём          рести
SFX Y   слаться шлешься      слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлется       слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлетесь      слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлемся       слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлются       слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлюсь        слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлёшься      слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлётся       слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлётесь      слаться
SFX Y   слаться шлёмся       слаться
SFX Y   слать шлешь        слать
SFX Y   слать шлете        слать
SFX Y   слать шлет         слать
SFX Y   слать шлем         слать
SFX Y   слать шлют         слать
SFX Y   слать шлю          слать
SFX Y   слать шлёшь        слать
SFX Y   слать шлёте        слать
SFX Y   слать шлёт         слать
SFX Y   слать шлём         слать
SFX Y   скаться щутся        скаться
SFX Y   скаться щусь         скаться
SFX Y   скаться щешься       скаться
SFX Y   скаться щется        скаться
SFX Y   скаться щетесь       скаться
SFX Y   скаться щемся        скаться
SFX Y   скать щут          скать
SFX Y   скать щу           скать
SFX Y   скать щешь         скать
SFX Y   скать щете         скать
SFX Y   скать щет          скать
SFX Y   скать щем          скать
SFX Y   сеть шу           сеть
SFX Y   саться шутся        [^о]саться
SFX Y   саться шусь         [^о]саться
SFX Y   саться шешься       [^о]саться
SFX Y   саться шется        [^о]саться
SFX Y   саться шетесь       [^о]саться
SFX Y   саться шемся        [^о]саться
SFX Y   сать шут          [^о]сать
SFX Y   сать шу           [^о]сать
SFX Y   сать шешь         [^о]сать
SFX Y   сать шете         [^о]сать
SFX Y   сать шет          [^о]сать
SFX Y   сать шем          [^о]сать
SFX Y   раться рутся        [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться русь         [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться решься       [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться рется        [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ретесь       [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ремся        [^бд]раться
